Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 2. Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact
§ 33-40-212.
Rulemaking.

Notwithstanding the requirements imposed by W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-106

, the commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment.

The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively and efficiently achieve the purposes of the compact. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the commission exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope of the purposes of the compact, or the powers granted hereunder, then such an action by the commission shall be invalid and have no force and effect.

If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state.

Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the commission.

Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the commission, and at least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted upon, the commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:

On the website of the commission or other publicly accessible platform; and

On the website of each member state occupational therapy licensing board or other publicly accessible platform or the publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules.

The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:

The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the rule will be considered and voted upon;

The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for the proposed rule;

A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and

The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments.

Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the commission shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.

The commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is requested by:

At least twenty-five (25) persons;

A state or federal governmental subdivision or agency; or

An association or organization having at least twenty-five (25) members.

If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment, the commission shall publish the place, time and date of the scheduled public hearing. If the hearing is held via electronic means, the commission shall publish the mechanism for access to the electronic hearing. Under this subsection:

All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall notify the executive director of the commission or other designated member in writing of their desire to appear and testify at the hearing not less than five (5) business days before the scheduled date of the hearing;

Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing;

All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording will be made available on request;

Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings required by this section.

Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the commission shall consider all written and oral comments received.

If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing by interested parties is received, the commission may proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule without a public hearing.

The commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.

Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:

Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;

Prevent a loss of commission or member state funds;

Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is established by federal law or rule; or

Protect public health and safety.

The commission or an authorized committee of the commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the chair of the commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the commission.

History.

2022 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 54, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2022.

§ 33-40-213.
Oversight, dispute resolution and enforcement.

Oversight:

The executive, legislative and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact's purposes and intent. The provisions of this compact and the rules promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law;

All courts shall take judicial notice of the compact and the rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject matter of this compact which may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the commission;

The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any such proceeding and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact or promulgated rules.

Default, technical assistance and termination:

If the commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall:

Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other member states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing the default and any other action to be taken by the commission; and

Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.

If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the member states, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default;

Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state's legislature and each of the member states;

A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination;

The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting state;

The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the United states district court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices. The prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.

Dispute resolution:

Upon request by a member state, the commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among member states and between member and non-member states;

The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.

Enforcement:

The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact;

By majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the United States district court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices against a member state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees;

The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.

History.

2022 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 54, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2022.

§ 33-40-214.
Date of implementation of the interstate commission for occupational therapy practice and associated rules, withdrawal and amendment.

The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth member state. The provisions, which become effective at that time, shall be limited to the powers granted to the commission relating to assembly and the promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking powers necessary to the implementation and administration of the compact.

Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the commission's initial adoption of the rules shall be subject to the rules as they exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state.

Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same. Under this subsection:

A Member state's withdrawal shall not take effect until six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute;

Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state's occupational therapy licensing board to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of this act prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any occupational therapy licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a non-member state that does not conflict with the provisions of this compact.

This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states.

History.

2022 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 54, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2022.

§ 33-40-215.
Construction and severability.

This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any member state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any member state, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member states and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as to all severable matters.

History.

2022 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 54, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2022.

§ 33-40-216.
Binding effect of compact and other laws.

A licensee providing occupational therapy in a remote state under the compact privilege shall function within the laws and regulations of the remote state.

Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the compact.

Any laws in a member state in conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

Any lawful actions of the commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated by the commission, are binding upon the member states.

All agreements between the commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms.

In the event any provision of the compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, the provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.

History.

2022 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 54, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2022.